fr: Matériau du bras de suspension: Aluminium (moulé); Aluminium (forgé); Aluminium taillé dans la masse; Acier moulé; Chromoly (acier); Composite (non spécifié); Acier forgé; Acier estampé; Acier (non spécifié); Acier tubulaire; Autre
ko: 컨트롤 암 재질: 알루미늄(주조); 알루미늄(단조); 빌릿 알루미늄; 주강; 크로몰리(강철); 복합재(지정되지 않음); 단조 강철; 스탬핑 강철; 강철(지정되지 않음); 튜브형 강철; 기타
sv: Material för styrarmen: Aluminium (gjuten); Aluminium (smidd); Billet-aluminium; Gjutstål; Chromoly (stål); Komposit (ospecificerad); Smidesstål; Pressat stål; Stål (ospecificerad); Rörstål; Annat
sk-SK: Materiál ovládacieho ramena: Hliník (odlievaný); Hliník (kovaný); Frézovaný hliník; Odlievaná oceľ; Chróm-molybdén (oceľ); Kompozit (nešpecifikované); Kovaná oceľ; Lisovaná oceľ; Oceľ (nešpecifikované); Rúrková oceľ; Iné
sl-SI: Material krmilne ročice: Aluminij (liti); Aluminij (kovani); Billet aluminij; Lito jeklo; Krom-molibden (jeklo); Kompozit (nedoločeno); Kovano jeklo; Stisnjeno jeklo; Jeklo (nedoločeno); Cevasto jeklo; Drugo
fi: Ohjausvarren materiaali: Alumiini (valettu); Alumiini (taottu); Billet-alumiini; Valuteräs; Kromimolybdeeni (teräs); Komposiitti (määrittelemätön); Taottu teräs; Prässätty teräs; Teräs (määrittelemätön); Putkiteräs; Muu
zh-CN: 控制臂材质: 铝（铸造）; 铝（锻造）; 铝坯; 铸钢; 铬钼钢; 复合材料（未指定）; 锻钢; 冲压钢; 钢（未指定）; 管状钢; 其他
de: Material des Querlenkers: Aluminium (gegossen); Aluminium (geschmiedet); Billet-Aluminium; Stahlguss; Chrommolybdän (Stahl); Verbundstoff (keine Angabe); Schmiedestahl; Stanzblech; Stahl (keine Angabe); Stahlrohr; Sonstige
en: Control arm material: Aluminum (cast); Aluminum (forged); Billet aluminum; Cast steel; Chromoly (steel); Composite (unspecified); Forged steel; Stamped steel; Steel (unspecified); Tubular steel; Other
nl: Regelarm materiaal: Aluminium (gegoten); Aluminium (gesmeed); Billet aluminium; Gietstaal; Chromoly (staal); Composiet (ongespecificeerd); Gesmeed staal; Gestampt staal; Staal (ongespecificeerd); Buisvormig staal; Overig
th: วัสดุแขนควบคุม: อะลูมิเนียม (หล่อ); อะลูมิเนียม (ฟอร์จ); อะลูมิเนียมบิลเล็ต; เหล็กหล่อ; โครโมลี (เหล็ก); วัสดุคอมโพสิต (ไม่ระบุ); เหล็กฟอร์จ; เหล็กปั๊ม; เหล็ก (ไม่ระบุ); เหล็กท่อ; อื่นๆ
vi: Vật liệu cần điều khiển: Nhôm (đúc); Nhôm (rèn); Nhôm phôi; Thép đúc; Chromoly (thép); Composite (không xác định); Thép rèn; Thép dập; Thép (không xác định); Thép ống; Khác
hu: Lengőkar anyaga: Alumínium (öntött); Alumínium (kovácsolott); Mart alumínium; Acélöntvény; Króm-molibdén (acél); Kompozit (nem meghatározott); Kovácsolt acél; Sajtolt acél; Acél (nem meghatározott); Acélcső; Egyéb
pt-BR: Material do braço de controle: Alumínio (fundido); Alumínio (forjado); Alumínio billet; Aço fundido; Cromo-molibdênio (aço); Composto (não especificado); Aço forjado; Aço estampado; Aço (não especificado); Aço tubular; Outro
cs: Materiál řídicího ramene: Litý hliník; Kovaný hliník; Frézovaný hliník; Ocelolitina; Chrommolybdenová ocel; Kompozit (nespecifikováno); Kovaná ocel; Lisovaná ocel; Ocel (nespecifikováno); Trubková ocel; Jiné
zh-TW: 控制臂材質: 鋁 (鑄造); 鋁 (鍛造); 鋁錠; 鑄鋼; 鉻鉬鋼; 複合材料 (未指定); 鍛鋼; 沖壓鋼; 鋼 (未指定); 鋼管; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal upravljačke ruke: Aluminij (lijevani); Aluminij (kovani); Glodani aluminij; Lijevani čelik; Krom-molibden (čelik); Kompozit (nije navedeno); Kovani čelik; Prešani čelik; Čelik (nije navedeno); Cjevasti čelik; Ostalo
ja: コントロールアームの素材: アルミニウム (鋳造); アルミニウム (鍛造); ビレットアルミニウム; 鋳鋼; クロモリ (スチール); 複合材 (詳細不明); 鍛造スチール; プレススチール; スチール (種類指定なし); チューブスチール; その他
ro-RO: Materialul brațului de control: Aluminiu (turnat); Aluminiu (forjat); Aluminiu masiv; Oțel turnat; Chromoly (oțel); Compozit (nespecificat); Oțel forjat; Oțel ștanțat; Oțel (nespecificat); Oțel tubular; Altele
pt-PT: Material do braço de controlo: Alumínio (fundido); Alumínio (forjado); Alumínio billet; Aço fundido; Cromomolibdénio (aço); Compósito (não especificado); Aço forjado; Aço estampado; Aço (não especificado); Aço tubular; Outro
el: Υλικό βραχίονα ελέγχου: Αλουμίνιο (χυτό); Αλουμίνιο (σφυρήλατο); Μασίφ αλουμίνιο billet; Χυτοχάλυβας; Χρωμιομολυβδαινιούχος χάλυβας (Chromoly); Σύνθετο υλικό (μη καθορισμένο); Σφυρήλατος χάλυβας; Πρεσαριστός χάλυβας; Χάλυβας (μη καθορισμένος); Σωληνωτός χάλυβας; Άλλο
da: Materiale til styrearmen: Aluminium (støbt); Aluminium (smedet); Billet-aluminium; Støbestål; Chromoly (stål); Komposit (uspecificeret); Smedet stål; Stanset stål; Stål (uspecificeret); Stålrør; Andet
nb: Materiale for kontrollarm: Aluminium (støpt); Aluminium (smidd); Maskinert aluminium; Støpestål; Krommolybden (stål); Kompositt (uspesifisert); Smidd stål; Stanset stål; Stål (uspesifisert); Stålrør; Annet
it: Materiale del braccio di controllo: Alluminio (pressofuso); Alluminio (forgiato); Alluminio ricavato dal pieno; Acciaio fuso; Cromo-molibdeno (acciaio); Composito (non specificato); Acciaio forgiato; Acciaio stampato; Acciaio (non specificato); Acciaio tubolare; Altro
bg-BG: Материал на носача: Алуминий (лят); Алуминий (кован); Фрезован алуминий; Лята стомана; Хром-молибден (стомана); Композит (неуточнен); Кована стомана; Щампована стомана; Стомана (неуточнена); Тръбна стомана; Друг
ru: Материал рычага подвески: Литой алюминий; Кованый алюминий; Фрезерованный алюминий; Литая сталь; Хромомолибденовая сталь; Композит (не указан); Кованая сталь; Штампованная сталь; Сталь (не указана); Трубчатая сталь; Другое
pl: Materiał wahacza: Aluminium (odlewane); Aluminium (kute); Aluminium typu billet; Staliwo; Stal chromowo-molibdenowa (chromoly); Kompozyt (nieokreślony); Stal kuta; Stal tłoczona; Stal (nieokreślona); Stal rurowa; Inny
lt-LT: Valdymo svirties medžiaga: Aliuminis (lietas); Aliuminis (kaltas); Frezuotas aliuminis; Lietas plienas; Chrommolibdenas (plienas); Kompozitas (nenurodytas); Kaltas plienas; Štampuotas plienas; Plienas (nenurodytas); Vamzdinis plienas; Kita
tr: Salıncak kolu malzemesi: Alüminyum (döküm); Alüminyum (dövme); Kütük alüminyum; Dökme çelik; Kromoli (çelik); Kompozit (belirtilmemiş); Dövme çelik; Preslenmiş çelik; Çelik (belirtilmemiş); Çelik boru; Diğer
es: Material del brazo de control: Aluminio (fundido); Aluminio (forjado); Aluminio billet; Acero fundido; Cromolio (acero); Material compuesto (no especificado); Acero forjado; Acero estampado; Acero (no especificado); Acero tubular; Otro